District of Columbia statutes.
25-751

Limitations on container size.

(a)

The licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A, may sell and deliver no fewer than 6 miniatures of spirits or wine per purchase.

(b)

The licensee under a manufacturer’s license, wholesaler’s license, or an off-premises retailer’s license shall not sell an alcoholic beverage in any container which does not comply with the standards of fill set forth in the most recent regulations issued under the Federal Alcohol Administration Act, approved August 29, 1935 (49 Stat. 977; 27 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.).

(c)

No person shall sell or deliver in the District alcoholic beverages in containers of a capacity of 1/10 gallon, except the following:

(1)

Scotch whiskey, Irish whiskey, brandy, and rum;

(2)

Cordials and liqueurs, cocktails, highballs, gin fizzes, bitters, and similar specialties; or

(3)

Domestic and imported still wines and sparking wines.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959